es: Lado del oído: Bilateral; Izquierda; Par; Derecha; Otros
hr-HR: Strana uha: Obostrano; Lijeva; Dvostruka; Desna; Ostalo
zh-CN: 适配耳朵: 双侧; 左; 配对; 右; 其他
tr: Kulak tarafı: Çift taraflı; Sol; Çift; Sağ; Diğer
fi: Korvan puoli: Molemminpuolinen; Vasen; Pair; Oikea; Muu
ja: 耳側: 両側; 左; ペア; 右; その他
sv: Öronsida: Bilateral; Vänster; Par; Höger; Övrigt
el: Πλευρά αυτιού: Αμφοτερόπλευρο; Αριστερά; Ζεύγος; Δικαίωμα; Άλλο
sk-SK: Strana ucha: Obojstranná; Vľavo; Spárovať; Vpravo; Iné
pl: Strona ucha: Obustronna; Lewy; Para; Prawy; Inne
pt-BR: Lado da orelha: Bilateral; Esquerda; Par; Direita; Outro
en: Ear side: Bilateral; Left; Pair; Right; Other
da: Øresiden: Bilateral; Venstre; Par; Højre; Andet
fr: Côté de l’oreille: Bilatéral; Gauche; Double; Droite; Autre
vi: Bên tai: Hai bên; Trái; Đôi; Phải; Khác
hu: Fül oldala: Kétoldali; Bal oldal; Páros; Jobb oldal; Egyéb
sl-SI: Stran ušesa: Obojestransko; Leva; Dvojna; Desna; Drugo
ro-RO: Partea urechii: Bilateral; Stânga; Pereche; Dreapta; Altele
bg-BG: Страна на ухото: Двустранно; Вляво; Двойка; Вдясно; Други
lt-LT: Ausies pusė: Abipusis; Kairė; Pora; Dešinė; Kita
it: Lato dell'orecchio: Bilaterale; A sinistra; Paio; A destra; Altro
zh-TW: 耳側: 雙側; 左; 對坡; 右; 其他
nb: Øreside: Bilateral; Venstre; Par; Høyre; Annet
pt-PT: Orientação do aparelho: Bilateral; Esquerda; Par; Direita; Outro
th: ข้างหู: ทั้งสองข้าง; ด้านซ้าย; คู่; ด้านขวา; อื่นๆ
ko: 귀 측면: 양측; 왼쪽; 페어; 오른쪽; 기타
cs: Strana ucha: Oboustranný; Levá strana; Pair; Pravá strana; Jiné
nl: Oorkant: Bilateraal; Links; Paar; Rechts; Andere
ru: Сторона уха: Двусторонний; Слева; Пара; Справа; Другой
de: Ohrseite: Beidseitig; Links; Pair; Rechts; Sonstiges